Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-718
Commission; compensation; expenses.

Members of the Commission on Judicial Qualifications shall serve without compensation but they shall be reimbursed for all reasonable expenses incurred by them in connection with their duties as members of the commission as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees.

Laws 1967, c. 141, § 4, p. 431;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 36.